Utah statutes.
56-2-8.   Contents of livestock owners' application for fencing.

In addition to the information required by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the request for agency action shall:

(1)  identify the lands;

(2)  identify the name and address of the owner of the lands;

(3)  if any of the lands are owned by the United States or the state of Utah, designate the agency or department of government that administers the lands;

(4)  identify the nature of the right of each petitioner to drive, range, or graze sheep, cattle, horses, or mules on the lands; and

(5)  specify the ownership of the railroad sought to be fenced.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

